lexicon/number-alpha.lexc
! number-alpha.lexc
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!

! This file defines spelled-out "alphabetic" number sequences.
!
!  The definition here is rather ugly with a lot of replication. There
!  should be a cleaner solution, but it is not obvious (to me) with
!  lexc/xfst.
!   - If done using xfst, it can certainly be a lot neater, but then
!     suffixation (e.g., derivations to other word classes) needs to
!     be replicated in xfst.
!  - We (can) use xfst syntax in lexc below (in <>), but this does not
!    allow re-use of automata defined earlier in other places (other
!    other brackets or in an external xfst file)
!
!  Ugly as it is, the following works, one needs to be careful to
!  modify all replicated parts when modifications are needed.
! 
! The special symbol ⟪DB⟫ is inserted here between all parts,
! 'digits', and replaced optionally by space later. This allows
! accepting multi-token words like 'bin ikiyüz elli', or when they are
! written without spaces like 'binikiyüzelli' (quite common especially
! in financial documents).

Multichar_Symbols ⟪k⟫ ⟪t⟫ ⟪DB⟫ ⟪ques⟫


LEXICON Root
    n0;
    n0;
    n1;
    n10;
    n100;
    n1k;
    n1m;
    n1g;
    n1t;
    n1K;
kaç⟪ques⟫  #;

LEXICON n0
sıfır   #;
! we also squeeze half & quarter terms here
yarım   #;
buçuk   #;
çeyrek  #;
tek     #;

LEXICON n1 ! 1 to 9
bir⟪DB⟫      n1cont;
iki⟪DB⟫      n1cont;
üç⟪DB⟫       n1cont;
dör⟪t⟫⟪DB⟫    n1cont;
beş⟪DB⟫      n1cont;
altı⟪DB⟫     n1cont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     n1cont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    n1cont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    n1cont;



LEXICON n1cont
    #;
    NumHalf;

LEXICON  NumHalf
buçu⟪k⟫  #;


LEXICON n10 ! 11 to 99
on⟪DB⟫       n10cont;
yirmi⟪DB⟫    n10cont;
otuz⟪DB⟫     n10cont;
kırk⟪DB⟫     n10cont;
elli⟪DB⟫     n10cont;
altmış⟪DB⟫   n10cont;
yetmiş⟪DB⟫   n10cont;
seksen⟪DB⟫   n10cont;
doksan⟪DB⟫   n10cont;

LEXICON n10cont
    #;
    NumHalf;
    n1;


LEXICON n100 ! 100 to 999
    prefixN100;
    N100;

LEXICON prefixN100
iki⟪DB⟫      N100;
üç⟪DB⟫       N100;
dört⟪DB⟫   N100;
beş⟪DB⟫      N100;
altı⟪DB⟫     N100;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N100;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N100;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N100;

LEXICON N100
yüz⟪DB⟫    n100cont;

LEXICON   n100cont
    #;
    NumHalf;
    n10;
    n1;


!--------------------

LEXICON n1k ! 1000 to 999,999
    prefixN1k;
    N1k;

LEXICON prefixN1k
    prefixN1k2;
    prefixN1k10;
    prefixN1k100;

LEXICON prefixN1k1
bir⟪DB⟫      N1k2cont;
            prefixN1k2;

LEXICON prefixN1k2
iki⟪DB⟫      N1k2cont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1k2cont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1k2cont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1k2cont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1k2cont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1k2cont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1k2cont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1k2cont;

LEXICON N1k2cont
    N1k;

LEXICON  prefixN1k10
on⟪DB⟫       N1k10cont;
yirmi⟪DB⟫    N1k10cont;
otuz⟪DB⟫     N1k10cont;
kırk⟪DB⟫     N1k10cont;
elli⟪DB⟫     N1k10cont;
altmış⟪DB⟫   N1k10cont;
yetmiş⟪DB⟫   N1k10cont;
seksen⟪DB⟫   N1k10cont;
doksan⟪DB⟫   N1k10cont;

LEXICON N1k10cont
    N1k;
    prefixN1k1;

LEXICON  prefixN1k100
        N1k100pre;
        N1k100;

LEXICON   N1k100pre
iki⟪DB⟫      N1k100preCont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1k100preCont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1k100preCont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1k100preCont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1k100preCont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1k100preCont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1k100preCont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1k100preCont;

LEXICON   N1k100preCont
        N1k100;

LEXICON N1k100
yüz⟪DB⟫  N1k100Cont;

LEXICON     N1k100Cont
    N1k;
    prefixN1k10;

LEXICON N1k
bin⟪DB⟫  n1kCont;

LEXICON     n1kCont
    #;
    NumHalf;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;

!--------------------

LEXICON n1m ! 1,000,000 to 999,999,999
    prefixN1m;
    N1mNoPrefix;

LEXICON prefixN1m
    prefixN1m1;
    prefixN1m10;
    prefixN1m100;

LEXICON prefixN1m1
bir⟪DB⟫      N1m1cont;
iki⟪DB⟫      N1m1cont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1m1cont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1m1cont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1m1cont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1m1cont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1m1cont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1m1cont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1m1cont;

LEXICON N1m1cont
    N1m;

LEXICON  prefixN1m10
on⟪DB⟫       N1m10cont;
yirmi⟪DB⟫    N1m10cont;
otuz⟪DB⟫     N1m10cont;
kırk⟪DB⟫     N1m10cont;
elli⟪DB⟫     N1m10cont;
altmış⟪DB⟫   N1m10cont;
yetmiş⟪DB⟫   N1m10cont;
seksen⟪DB⟫   N1m10cont;
doksan⟪DB⟫   N1m10cont;

LEXICON N1m10cont
    N1m;
    prefixN1m1;

LEXICON  prefixN1m100
        N1m100pre;
        N1m100;

LEXICON   N1m100pre
iki⟪DB⟫      N1m100preCont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1m100preCont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1m100preCont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1m100preCont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1m100preCont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1m100preCont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1m100preCont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1m100preCont;

LEXICON   N1m100preCont
        N1m100;

LEXICON N1m100
yüz⟪DB⟫  N1m100Cont;

LEXICON     N1m100Cont
    N1m;
    prefixN1m10;

LEXICON N1m
milyon⟪DB⟫   n1mCont;

LEXICON N1mNoPrefix
milyon⟪DB⟫   #;

LEXICON     n1mCont
    #;
    NumHalf;
    n1k;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;

!------------------

LEXICON n1g ! 1,000,000,000 to 999,999,999,999
    prefixN1g;
    N1gNoPrefix;

LEXICON prefixN1g
    prefixN1g1;
    prefixN1g10;
    prefixN1g100;

LEXICON prefixN1g1
bir⟪DB⟫      N1g1cont;
iki⟪DB⟫      N1g1cont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1g1cont;
dört⟪DB⟫    N1g1cont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1g1cont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1g1cont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1g1cont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1g1cont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1g1cont;

LEXICON N1g1cont
    N1g;

LEXICON  prefixN1g10
on⟪DB⟫       N1g10cont;
yirmi⟪DB⟫    N1g10cont;
otuz⟪DB⟫     N1g10cont;
kırk⟪DB⟫     N1g10cont;
elli⟪DB⟫     N1g10cont;
altmış⟪DB⟫   N1g10cont;
yetmiş⟪DB⟫   N1g10cont;
seksen⟪DB⟫   N1g10cont;
doksan⟪DB⟫   N1g10cont;

LEXICON N1g10cont
    N1g;
    prefixN1g1;

LEXICON  prefixN1g100
        N1g100pre;
        N1g100;

LEXICON   N1g100pre
iki⟪DB⟫      N1g100preCont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1g100preCont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1g100preCont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1g100preCont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1g100preCont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1g100preCont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1g100preCont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1g100preCont;

LEXICON   N1g100preCont
        N1g100;

LEXICON N1g100
yüz⟪DB⟫  N1g100Cont;

LEXICON     N1g100Cont
    N1g;
    prefixN1g10;

LEXICON N1g
milyar⟪DB⟫   n1gCont;

LEXICON N1gNoPrefix
milyar⟪DB⟫   #;

LEXICON     n1gCont
    #;
    NumHalf;
    n1m;
    n1k;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;

!------------------

LEXICON n1t ! 1,000,000,000 to 999,999,999,999
    prefixN1t;
    N1tNoPrefix;

LEXICON prefixN1t
    prefixN1t1;
    prefixN1t10;
    prefixN1t100;

LEXICON prefixN1t1
bir⟪DB⟫      N1t1cont;
iki⟪DB⟫      N1t1cont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1t1cont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1t1cont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1t1cont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1t1cont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1t1cont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1t1cont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1t1cont;

LEXICON N1t1cont
    N1t;

LEXICON  prefixN1t10
on⟪DB⟫       N1t10cont;
yirmi⟪DB⟫    N1t10cont;
otuz⟪DB⟫     N1t10cont;
kırk⟪DB⟫     N1t10cont;
elli⟪DB⟫     N1t10cont;
altmış⟪DB⟫   N1t10cont;
yetmiş⟪DB⟫   N1t10cont;
seksen⟪DB⟫   N1t10cont;
doksan⟪DB⟫   N1t10cont;

LEXICON N1t10cont
    N1t;
    prefixN1t1;

LEXICON  prefixN1t100
        N1t100pre;
        N1t100;

LEXICON   N1t100pre
iki⟪DB⟫      N1t100preCont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1t100preCont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1t100preCont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1t100preCont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1t100preCont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1t100preCont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1t100preCont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1t100preCont;

LEXICON   N1t100preCont
        N1t100;

LEXICON N1t100
yüz⟪DB⟫  N1t100Cont;

LEXICON     N1t100Cont
    N1t;
    prefixN1t10;

LEXICON N1t
trilyon⟪DB⟫      n1tCont;

LEXICON N1tNoPrefix
trilyon⟪DB⟫   #;

LEXICON     n1tCont
    #;
    NumHalf;
    n1g;
    n1m;
    n1k;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;

!------------------

LEXICON n1K ! 1,000,000,000,000,000 
    prefixN1K;
    N1KNoPrefix;

LEXICON prefixN1K
    prefixN1K1;
    prefixN1K10;
    prefixN1K100;

LEXICON prefixN1K1
bir⟪DB⟫      N1K1cont;
iki⟪DB⟫      N1K1cont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1K1cont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1K1cont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1K1cont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1K1cont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1K1cont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1K1cont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1K1cont;

LEXICON N1K1cont
    N1K;

LEXICON  prefixN1K10
on⟪DB⟫       N1K10cont;
yirmi⟪DB⟫    N1K10cont;
otuz⟪DB⟫     N1K10cont;
kırk⟪DB⟫     N1K10cont;
elli⟪DB⟫     N1K10cont;
altmış⟪DB⟫   N1K10cont;
yetmiş⟪DB⟫   N1K10cont;
seksen⟪DB⟫   N1K10cont;
doksan⟪DB⟫   N1K10cont;

LEXICON N1K10cont
    N1K;
    prefixN1K1;

LEXICON  prefixN1K100
        N1K100pre;
        N1K100;

LEXICON   N1K100pre
iki⟪DB⟫      N1K100preCont;
üç⟪DB⟫       N1K100preCont;
dört⟪DB⟫   N1K100preCont;
beş⟪DB⟫      N1K100preCont;
altı⟪DB⟫     N1K100preCont;
yedi⟪DB⟫     N1K100preCont;
sekiz⟪DB⟫    N1K100preCont;
dokuz⟪DB⟫    N1K100preCont;

LEXICON   N1K100preCont
        N1K100;

LEXICON N1K100
yüz⟪DB⟫  N1K100Cont;

LEXICON     N1K100Cont
    N1K;
    prefixN1K10;

LEXICON N1K
katrilyon⟪DB⟫      n1KCont;

LEXICON N1KNoPrefix
katrilyon⟪DB⟫   #;

LEXICON     n1KCont
    #;
    NumHalf;
    n1t;
    n1g;
    n1m;
    n1k;
    n100;
    n10;
    n1;
